New York, session 2025-2026, A4240.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 404-ff to read as follows: 3 § 404-ff. Distinctive plates for New York city fire riders motorcycle 4 club. 1. Any member of the New York city fire riders motorcycle club 5 shall, upon request, be issued a license plate bearing the words "NYC 6 Fire Riders". Application for said license plate shall be filed with the 7 commissioner in such form and detail as the commissioner shall 8 prescribe. 9 2. A distinctive plate authorized by subdivision one of this section 10 shall be issued upon proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the 11 applicant is a member of the New York city fire riders motorcycle club. 12 3. For the purposes of this section, "member of the New York city fire 13 riders motorcycle club" shall mean a person who is a resident of this 14 state, who is an active or retired uniformed member of the New York city 15 fire department and who holds an active membership in the New York city 16 fire riders motorcycle club. 17 4. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 18 in the same manner as other number plates upon the payment of the regu- 19 lar registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this 20 article, provided, however, that an additional annual service charge of 21 twenty-five dollars shall be charged for such plate. 22 § 2. (a) A distinctive plate established pursuant to section 404-ff 23 of the vehicle and traffic law shall only be designed, produced and 24 issued upon the delivery to the department of motor vehicles of a surety 25 bond in the amount of six thousand dollars, which shall be executed by a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02466-01-5 A. 4240 2 1 surety company authorized by the department of financial services to 2 transact business in this state. Provided, however, that if the commis- 3 sioner of motor vehicles shall have received prior to plate design, 4 production and issuance at least two hundred orders for such distinctive 5 plate together with the additional annual service charge applicable to 6 each such order, which shall be non-refundable, no such surety bond 7 shall be required. All service charges collected pursuant to this 8 section shall be deposited pursuant to the provisions of section 404-oo 9 of the vehicle and traffic law to the credit of the department of motor 10 vehicles distinctive plate development fund established by section 95-g 11 of the state finance law and shall be used for the design, production, 12 advertising and distribution of distinctive license plates in accordance 13 with such section 95-g. 14 (b) If, upon the expiration of two years following the date upon which 15 distinctive plates in the series are first available for sale two 16 hundred or more sets of such plates are sold, a bond delivered pursuant 17 to this section shall be discontinued. If fewer than two hundred sets of 18 such plates are sold by such time, the department of motor vehicles 19 shall be entitled to recover against the bond in an amount proportionate 20 to such shortfall. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 22 section one of this act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth 23 day after it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addi- 24 tion, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for 25 the implementation of section one of this act on its effective date are 26 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.